Maryland, session 2025, HB1434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “healthy food priority area” means a predominantly
low–income area that has limited access to retail outlets that sell affordable, healthy foods.
(b) The Maryland Food System Resiliency Council shall:
(1) conduct an assessment of strategies to attract and retain grocery stores
and supermarket retailers in healthy food priority areas, including a review of existing
incentives and available financing programs in this State and other states; and
(2) prepare a report on the Council’s findings and recommendations
regarding strategies to attract and retain grocery stores in healthy food priority areas.
There is a Food Deserts Workgroup.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1434*

HOUSE BILL 1434
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Aging, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Agriculture, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(7) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(8) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(9) the Secretary of Planning, or the Secretary’s designee;
(10) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(11) one member of the Maryland Food System Resiliency Council,
designated by the Secretary of Emergency Management;
(12) one representative of the Maryland Municipal League, designated by
the Chief Executive Officer of the Maryland Municipal League; and
(13) the following representatives of the Maryland Association of Counties,
designated by the Executive Director of the Maryland Association of Counties:
(i) one representative from a rural county;
(ii) one representative from a suburban county; and
(iii) one representative from Baltimore City.
(c) The members of the Workgroup shall elect the chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall provide staff
for the Workgroup.

HOUSE BILL 1434 3
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) conduct an analysis of food deserts in the State that includes:
(i) a discussion of the overall concept of food deserts and the location
of food deserts in the State;
(ii) an examination of the health impacts of food deserts on the local
population, including any related environmental concerns, and the impacts of food deserts
on the economy;
(iii) an assessment of strategies to attract grocery stores and
supermarket retailers to identified food deserts and any associated costs, including a review
of existing incentives and available financing programs in this State and in other states;
and
(iv) any other topic, as determined by the Workgroup, related to food
deserts; and
(2) prepare a report that includes:
(i) key findings from the Workgroup’s analysis conducted under
paragraph (1) of this subsection; and
(ii) recommendations regarding solutions to eliminate food deserts
in the State.
(g) (c) On or before November 1 December 31, 2025, the Workgroup Council shall
submit the report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly, the Senate
Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment, the Senate Finance Committee,
the House Economic Matters Committee, and the House Environment and Transportation
Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.